District of Columbia statutes.
31-738

Rulemaking.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Sept. 20, 1996, D.C. Law 11-159, § 9, 43 DCR 3714
1981 Ed., § 35-3728.
See notes to § 35-3721.